Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2918
Investment program; lien subordination; repayments; modification.

(1) The investment program may subordinate its lien to senior debt if the commission determines that such subordination is necessary to finance the project and is consistent with any bond covenant.

(2) The investment program may extend, defer, capitalize, or restructure repayments to preserve project viability or to mitigate financial hardship, subject to federal requirements and the approval of the commission.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 18.
July 18, 2026